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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC P003 1 OxygenSensorHeaterControlCircuitLow
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0032 Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit High
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0037 Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit Low
(Bank 1 Sensor2)

DTC P0038 Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit High
(Bank 1 Sensor2)

DTC P005 1 OxygenSensorHeaterControlCircuitLow
(Bank2Sensor 1)

DTC P0052 Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit High
(Bank2Sensor 1)

DTC P0057 Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit Low
(Bank 2 Sensor 2)

DTC P0058 Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit High
(Bank 2 Sensor 2)
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CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Toobtainahighpurification rate for theCO,HCandNOxcomponentsof theexhaustgas,a three −waycata-
lyticconverter isused,but for themostefficientuseof the three −waycatalyticconverter, theair −fuel ratio
mustbepreciselycontrolledso that it isalwaysclose to thestoichiometricair −fuel ratio.
The heated oxygen sensor has the characteristic which its output voltage changes suddenly in the vicinity
of thestoichiometricair −fuel ratio.Thischaracteristic isused todetect theoxygenconcentration in theex-
haustgasandprovide theenginecontrolECUwith feedback tocontrol theair −fuel ratio.
When theair −fuel ratiobecomesLEAN, theoxygenconcentration in theexhaust increasesand theheated
oxygen sensor informs the engine control ECU of the LEAN condition (low voltage, i.e. less than 0.45 V).
When theair −fuel ratio isRICHERthan thestoichiometricair −fuel ratio, theoxygenconcentration in theex-
haust gas is reduced and the heated oxygen sensor informs the engine control ECU of the RICH condition
(high voltage, i.e. more than 0.45 V). The engine control ECU judges by the voltage output from the heated
oxygensensorwhether theair −fuel ratio isRICHorLEANandcontrols the injection timeaccordingly.Howev-
er, if malfunction of the heated oxygen sensor causes output of abnormal voltage, this disables the engine
controlECUforperforminganaccurateair −fuel ratiocontrol.Theheatedoxygensensors includeaheater
which heats the zirconia element. The heater is controlled by the engine control ECU. When the intake air
volume is low (the temperature of the exhaust gas is low) current flows to the heater to heat the sensor for
accurate oxygen concentration detection.

HINT:
The engine control ECU provides a pulse width modulated control circuit to adjust current through the heater.
The heated oxygen sensor heater circuit uses a relay on the B+ side of the circuit.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0031
P0037

Heater current is 0.25 A or less when the heater operates with
th 10 5 V iti b tt lt

SOpen inheatercircuit ofheatedoxygensensor
SHeatedox ygensensorheate rP0037

P0051
P0057

more than 10.5Vpositivebatteryvoltage
(1 tripdetection logic)

S Heated oxygen sensor heater
SEFIorECDrelay
SEnginecontrolECU

P0032
P0038
P0052
P0058

Whenheaterdoesnotoperates,heatercurrentexceeds2.0A
(1 tripdetection logic)

SShort inheatercircuit ofheatedoxygensensor
SHeatedoxygensensorheater

SEFIorECDrelay
SEnginecontrolECU

HINT:
S Bank 1 refers tobank the includescylinderNo. 1.
S Bank2refers tobank thatdoesnot includescylinderNo. 1.
S Sensor1 refers to thesensorcloser to theengineassembly.
S Sensor2 refers to thesensor fartheraway fromtheengineassembly.

MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The sensing portion of the heated oxygen sensor has a zirconia element which is used to detect oxygen
concentration in the exhaust. If the zirconia element is at the proper temperature and difference of the oxy-
gen concentration between the inside and outside surface of sensor is large, the zirconia element will gener-
ate voltage signals. In order to increase the oxygen concentration detecting capacity in the zirconia element,
the engine control ECU supplements the heat from the exhaust with heat from a heating element inside the
sensor. When heater current in the sensor is out of the standard operating range, the engine control ECU
interprets this as a fault in the heated oxygen sensor and sets a DTC.
Example:
The engine control ECU will set a high current DTC if the current in the sensor is more than 2.0 A. Similarly,
the engine control ECU will set a low current DTC if the current is less than 0.25 A when the heater is ON.
The monitor runs if conditions below is met:
Engine is started and run at idle for 9 minutes or more.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful to determine whether the vehicle was running
or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio was lean or rich, etc. at the time of the mal-
function.

1 Check resistance of heated oxygen sensor heater.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen sensor
connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals of the heated oxygen
sensor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

HT (H11−1) − +B (H11−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H12−1) − +B (H12−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H13−1) − +B (H13−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H14−1) − +B (H14−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

NG Replace heated oxygen sensor.

OK
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2 Check EFI or ECD relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.
CHECK:
Inspect the EFI or ECD relay.
OK:

Terminal No. Condition Specified Condition

2 − 4 Constant Continuity

Usually No Continuity

1 − 3 Apply B+ between
terminals 2 and 4

Continuity

NG Replace EFI or ECD relay.

OK
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3 Check voltage between terminals HT1A, HT2A, HT1B, HT2B of engine control
ECU connectors and body ground.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals of the engine control
ECU connectors and body ground.
HINT:
S Connect terminal HT1A to the bank 1 sensor 1.
S Connect terminal HT1B to the bank 1 sensor 2.
S Connect terminal HT2A to the bank 2 sensor 1.
S Connect terminal HT2B to the bank 2 sensor 2.

OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

HT1A (E8−4) − Body ground 9 to 14 V

HT1B (E8−5) − Body ground 9 to 14 V

HT2A (E8−33) − Body ground 9 to 14 V

HT2B (E8−25) − Body ground 9 to 14 V

OK Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).

NG

Check and repair harness or connector between EFI or ECD relay and heated oxygen sensor, and
heated oxygen sensor and engine control ECU (See page IN−20).


